California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.   (AB 2838)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.7. Energy Storage Systems [2835. - 2839.]

2835.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Energy storage system” means commercially available technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing it for a period of time, and thereafter dispatching the energy. An “energy storage system” may have any of the characteristics in paragraph (2), shall accomplish one of the purposes in paragraph (3), and shall
 meet at least one of the characteristics in paragraph (4).

(2) An “energy storage system” may have any of the following characteristics:

(A) Be either centralized or distributed.

(B) Be either owned by a load-serving entity or local publicly owned electric utility, a customer of a load-serving entity or local publicly owned electric utility, or a third party, or is jointly owned by two or more of the above.

(3) An “energy storage system” shall be cost effective and either reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, reduce demand for peak electrical generation, defer or substitute for an investment in generation, transmission, or distribution assets, or improve the reliable operation of the electrical transmission or distribution grid.

(4) An “energy storage system” shall do one or more of the following:

(A) Use mechanical, chemical, or thermal processes to store energy that was generated at one time for use at a later time.

(B) Store thermal energy for direct use for heating or cooling at a later time in a manner that avoids the need to use electricity at that later time.

(C) Use mechanical, chemical, or thermal processes to store energy generated from renewable resources for use at a later time.

(D) Use mechanical, chemical, or thermal processes to store energy generated from mechanical processes that would otherwise be wasted for delivery at a later time.

(b) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380.

(c) “New” means, in reference to an energy storage system, a system that is installed and first becomes operational after January 1, 2010.

(d) “Offpeak” means, in reference to electrical demand, a period that is not within a peak demand period.

(e) “Peak demand period” means a period of high daily, weekly, or seasonal demand for electricity. For purposes of this chapter, the peak demand period for a load-serving entity shall be determined, or approved, by the commission and shall be determined, or approved, for a local publicly owned electric utility, by its governing body.

(f) “Procure” and “procurement” means, in reference to the procurement of an energy storage
 system, to acquire by ownership or by a contractual right to use the energy from, or the capacity of, including ancillary services, an energy storage system owned by a load-serving entity, local publicly owned electric utility, customer, or third party. Nothing in this chapter, and no action by the commission, shall discourage or disadvantage development and ownership of an energy storage system by an electrical corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.

(a) (1) On or before March 1, 2012, the commission shall open a proceeding to determine appropriate targets, if any, for each load-serving entity to procure viable and cost-effective energy storage systems to be achieved by December 31, 2015, and December 31, 2020. As part of this proceeding, the commission may consider a variety of possible policies to encourage the cost-effective
 deployment of energy storage systems, including refinement of existing procurement methods to properly value energy storage systems.

(2) The commission shall adopt the procurement targets, if determined to be appropriate pursuant to paragraph (1), by October 1, 2013.

(3) The commission shall reevaluate the determinations made pursuant to this subdivision not less than once every three years.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the commission’s evaluation and approval of any application for funding or recovery of costs of any ongoing or new development, trialing, and testing of energy storage projects or technologies outside of the proceeding required by this chapter.

(b) (1) On or before March 1, 2012, the governing board of each
 local publicly owned electric utility shall initiate a process to determine appropriate targets, if any, for the utility to procure viable and cost-effective energy storage systems to be achieved by December 31, 2016, and December 31, 2020. As part of this proceeding, the governing board may consider a variety of possible policies to encourage the cost-effective deployment of energy storage systems, including refinement of existing procurement methods to properly value energy storage systems.

(2) The governing board shall adopt the procurement targets, if determined to be appropriate pursuant to paragraph (1), by October 1, 2014.

(3) The governing board shall reevaluate the determinations made pursuant to this subdivision not less than once every three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 9.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.2.

In adopting and reevaluating appropriate energy storage system procurement targets and policies pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2836, the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Consider existing operational data and results of testing and trial pilot projects from existing energy storage facilities.

(b) Consider available information from the
 California Independent System Operator derived from California Independent System Operator testing and evaluation procedures.

(c) Consider the integration of energy storage technologies with other programs, including demand-side management or other means of achieving the purposes identified in Section 2837 that will result in the most efficient use of generation resources and cost-effective energy efficient grid integration and management.

(d) Ensure that the energy storage system procurement targets and policies that are established are technologically viable and cost effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.4.

(a) An energy storage system may be used to meet the resource adequacy requirements established for a load-serving entity pursuant to Section 380 if it meets applicable standards.

(b) An energy storage system may be used to meet the resource adequacy requirements established by a local publicly owned electric utility pursuant to Section 9620 if it meets applicable standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.6.

All procurement of energy storage systems by a load-serving entity or local publicly owned electric utility shall be cost effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.7.

By June 1, 2018, all of the following shall occur:

(a) (1) The Los Angeles Department of Water and Power shall, in coordination with the city council of the City of Los Angeles, if it chooses to participate, determine the cost-effectiveness and feasibility of deploying, on an expedited basis, a minimum aggregate total of 100 megawatts of cost-effective energy storage solutions to help address the Los Angeles Basin’s electrical system operational limitations resulting from reduced gas deliverability from the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility.

(2) If the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power determines pursuant to paragraph (1) that deploying the cost-effective energy storage solutions, as
 described in paragraph (1), is cost effective and feasible, it shall consider deploying those cost-effective energy storage solutions after June 1, 2018.

(b) The commission shall, to the extent that doing so is cost effective and feasible and necessary to meet the reliability requirements of the electrical system in the Los Angeles Basin, direct an electrical corporation serving the Los Angeles Basin to deploy, pursuant to a competitive solicitation, a minimum aggregate total of 20 megawatts of cost-effective energy storage solutions to help address the Los Angeles Basin’s electrical system operational limitations resulting from reduced gas deliverability from the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility. An electrical corporation may count any cost-effective energy storage solution that it deploys pursuant to this subdivision towards the capacity requirement established pursuant to Section 2838.2 if the cost-effective storage solution that it
 deploys is a distributed energy storage system, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2838.2.

(c) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission and all public utilities having jurisdiction affected by this section or by actions taken pursuant to this section shall take immediate actions to support rapid compliance with this section, including by allowing or developing fast-tracked permitting, interconnection studies, and interconnection processes, and through rule waivers or adjustments if appropriate, to support rapid or more rapid site acquisition for energy storage project developments and customer acquisition of energy storage solutions. This paragraph is not intended to in any way modify the obligations of the commission or a public utility under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that local governments having jurisdiction affected by this section or by actions taken pursuant to this section strongly consider taking immediate actions to support rapid compliance with this section, including by allowing or developing fast-tracked permitting and waiving or adjusting procedural requirements, to support rapid or more rapid site acquisition for energy storage project developments and customer acquisition of energy storage solutions. This paragraph is not intended to in any way modify the obligations of a local government under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Cost-effective energy storage
 solution” means any grid-connected energy storage facility developed on or after the effective date of this section of any type or technology, including transmission-connected, distribution-connected, and behind-the-meter sited or located resources, that will mitigate the limitation on gas storage capacity and gas deliverability resulting from the well failure at the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility. Cost-effective energy storage solutions shall be designed to be capable of providing a four-hour duration resource adequacy service, which may include energy delivery for the full four hours at a rated output, and shall be capable of delivering electricity to the source of demand and required to accept and execute reasonable remote or centralized dispatch commands.

(2) To “deploy” means to procure a cost-effective energy storage solution on or after the effective date of this section that may be a third-party-owned solution, or a solution
 procured pursuant to a power-purchase agreement or rebate program, or pursuant to any other third-party ownership structure, as allowed by applicable rules governing electric service and procurement, sited or located where the project will mitigate the limitation on gas storage capacity and gas deliverability resulting from the well failure at the Aliso Canyon natural gas storage facility.

(3) “Los Angeles Basin” means the area identified as the “Aliso Canyon Delivery Area” on page 11 of the Aliso Canyon Risk Assessment Technical Report, dated April 5, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 175.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.

Each electrical corporation’s renewable energy procurement plan, prepared and approved pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1, shall require the utility to procure new energy storage systems that are appropriate to allow the electrical corporation to comply with the energy storage system procurement targets and policies adopted pursuant to Section 2836. The plan shall address the acquisition and use of energy storage systems in order to achieve the
 following purposes:

(a) Integrate intermittent generation from eligible renewable energy resources into the reliable operation of the transmission and distribution grid.

(b) Allow intermittent generation from eligible renewable energy resources to operate at or near full capacity.

(c) Reduce the need for new fossil-fuel powered peaking generation facilities by using stored electricity to meet peak demand.

(d) Reduce purchases of electricity generation sources with higher emissions of greenhouse gases.

(e) Eliminate or reduce transmission and distribution losses, including increased losses during periods of congestion on the grid.

(f) Reduce the demand for electricity during peak periods and achieve permanent load-shifting by using thermal storage to meet air-conditioning needs.

(g) Avoid or delay investments in transmission and distribution system upgrades.

(h) Use energy storage systems to provide the ancillary services otherwise provided by fossil-fueled generating facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.

(a) (1) By January 1, 2016, each load-serving entity shall submit a report to the commission demonstrating that it has complied with the energy storage system procurement targets and policies adopted by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2836.

(2) By January 1, 2021, each load-serving entity shall submit a report to the commission demonstrating that it has
 complied with the energy storage system procurement targets and policies adopted by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2836.

(b) The commission shall ensure that a copy of each report required by subdivision (a), with any confidential information redacted, is available on the commission’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.2.

(a) The following definitions apply to this section:

(1) “Distributed energy storage system” means an energy storage system with a useful life of at least 10 years that is connected to the distribution system or is located on the customer side of the meter.

(2) “Energy storage management system” means a system by which an electrical corporation can manage the charging and discharging of the distributed energy storage system in a manner that provides benefits to ratepayers.

(b) The commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board and the Energy Commission, shall
 direct the state’s three largest electrical corporations to file applications for programs and investments to accelerate widespread deployment of distributed energy storage systems to achieve ratepayer benefits, reduce dependence on petroleum, meet air quality standards, and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases. Programs and investments proposed by the state’s three largest electrical corporations shall seek to minimize overall costs and maximize overall benefits.

(c) (1) The commission may approve, or modify and approve, programs and investments of an electrical corporation in distributed energy storage systems with appropriate energy storage management systems and reasonable mechanisms for cost recovery, if they are consistent with the requirements of this section and do not unreasonably limit or impair the ability of nonutility enterprises to market and deploy energy storage systems. The total capacity of the programs
 and investments in distributed energy storage systems approved by the commission pursuant to this section shall not exceed 500 megawatts, divided equally among the state’s three largest electrical corporations.

(2) No more than 25 percent of the capacity of distributed energy storage systems approved for programs and investments pursuant to this section shall be provided by behind-the-meter systems.

(3) The capacity authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) is in addition to any investments authorized pursuant to Section 2836.

(d) (1) The commission shall resolve each application filed by an electrical corporation pursuant to this section within 12 months of the date of filing of the completed application.

(2) The commission shall
 prioritize those programs and investments that provide distributed energy storage systems to public sector and low-income customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 681, Sec. 2.   (AB 2868)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission, in authorizing an electrical corporation to recover the costs of approved energy storage programs and investments from all customers pursuant to Section 2838.2, shall ensure that the costs for the programs and investments are recovered in proportion to the benefits received, consistent with Section 451.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 681, Sec. 3.   (AB 2868)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.5.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the requirements of this chapter do not apply to either of the following:

(a) An electrical corporation that has 60,000 or fewer customer accounts within California.

(b) A public utility district that receives all of its electricity pursuant to a preference right adopted and authorized by the United States
 Congress pursuant to Section 4 of the Trinity River Division Act of August 12, 1955 (Public Law 84-386).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2839.

The commission does not have authority or jurisdiction to enforce any of the requirements of this chapter against a local publicly owned electric utility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 606, Sec. 11.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Energy Efficiency Systems [2840. - 2843.]



  ARTICLE 1. Waste Heat and Carbon Emissions Reduction Act [2840. - 2843.]

2840.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Waste Heat and Carbon Emissions Reduction Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2840.2.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Combined heat and power system” means a system that produces both electricity and thermal energy for heating or cooling from a single fuel input that meets all of the following:

(1) Is interconnected to, and operates in parallel with, the electrical transmission and distribution grid.

(2) Is sized to meet the eligible customer-generator’s onsite thermal demand.

(3) Meets the efficiency standards of subdivisions (a) and (d) of, and the greenhouse gases emissions performance
 standard of subdivision (f) of, Section 2843.

(b) “Eligible customer-generator” means a customer of an electrical corporation that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Uses a combined heat and power system with a generating capacity of not more than 20 megawatts, that first commences operation on or after January 1, 2008.

(2) Uses a time-of-use meter capable of registering the flow of electricity in two directions. If the existing electrical meter of an eligible customer-generator is not capable of measuring the flow of electricity in two directions, the eligible customer-generator shall be responsible for all expenses involved in purchasing and installing a meter that is able to measure electricity flow in two directions. If an additional meter or meters are installed, the electricity flow calculations
 shall yield a result identical to that of a time-of-use meter.

(c) “Excess electricity” means the net electricity exported to the electrical grid, generated by a combined heat and power system that is in compliance with Section 2843.

(d) “Greenhouse gas” or “greenhouse gases” includes all of the following gases: carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur hexafluoride.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 36.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2840.4.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Combined heat and power systems produce both electricity and thermal energy from a single fuel input, thus achieving much greater efficiency than the usual separate systems for producing these forms of energy, and reducing consumption of fuel.

(b) Combined heat and power systems recover heat that would otherwise be wasted in separate energy applications, and use this heat to
 avoid consumption of fuel that would otherwise be required to produce heat.

(c) Gigawatthours of potential useful electricity and millions of British thermal units of thermal energy could be derived from unused waste heat that is currently being vented into the atmosphere.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2840.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that state policies dramatically advance the efficiency of the state’s use of natural gas by capturing unused waste heat, and in so doing, help offset the growing crisis in electricity supply and transmission congestion in the state.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce wasteful consumption of energy through improved residential, commercial, institutional, industrial, and manufacturer utilization of waste heat whenever it is
 cost effective, technologically feasible, and environmentally beneficial, particularly when this reduces emissions of carbon dioxide and other carbon-based greenhouse gases.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to support and facilitate both customer- and utility-owned combined heat and power systems.

(d) This article does not apply to, and shall not impact, combined heat and power systems in operation prior to January 1, 2008, or combined heat and power systems with a generating capacity greater than 20 megawatts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2841.

(a) The commission may require an electrical corporation to purchase from an eligible customer-generator, excess electricity that is delivered to the grid that is generated by a combined heat and power system that is in compliance with Section 2843. The commission may establish a maximum kilowatthours limitation on the amount of excess electricity that an electrical corporation is required to purchase if the commission finds that the anticipated excess electricity generated has an adverse effect on long-term resource planning or reliable
 operation of the grid. The commission shall establish, in consultation with the Independent System Operator, tariff provisions that facilitate both the provisions of this chapter and the reliable operation of the grid.

(b) (1) Every electrical corporation shall file with the commission a standard tariff for the purchase of excess electricity from an eligible customer-generator.

(2) The tariff shall provide for payment for every kilowatthour delivered to the electrical grid by the combined heat and power system at a price determined by the commission.

(3) The tariff shall include flexible rates with options for different durations, not to exceed 10 years, and fixed or variable rates relative to the cost of natural gas.

(4) The
 commission shall ensure that ratepayers not utilizing combined heat and power systems are held indifferent to the existence of this tariff.

(c) The commission, in reviewing the tariff filed by an electrical corporation, shall establish time-of-delivery rates that encourage demand management and net generation of electricity during periods of peak system demand.

(d) Every electrical corporation shall make the tariff available to eligible customer-generators that own, or lease, and operate a combined heat and power system within the service territory of the electrical corporation, upon request. An electrical corporation may make the terms of the tariff available to an eligible customer in the form of a standard contract.

(e) The costs and benefits associated with any tariff or contract entered into by an electrical
 corporation pursuant to this section shall be allocated to all benefiting customers. For purposes of this section “benefiting customers” may, as determined by the commission, include bundled service customers of the electrical corporation, customers of the electrical corporation that receive their electric service through a direct transaction, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 331, and customers of an electrical corporation that receive their electric service from a community choice aggregator, as defined in Section 331.1.

(f) The physical generating capacity of the combined heat and power system shall count toward the resource adequacy requirements of load-serving entities for purposes of Section 380.

(g) The commission shall adopt or maintain standby rates or charges for combined heat and power systems that are based only upon assumptions that are supported by factual
 data, and shall exclude any assumptions that forced outages or other reductions in electricity generation by combined heat and power systems will occur simultaneously on multiple systems, or during periods of peak electrical system demand, or both.

(h) The commission may modify or adjust the requirements of this article for any electrical corporation with less than 100,000 service connections, as individual circumstances merit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2841.5.

A local publicly owned electric utility serving retail end-use customers shall establish a program that does both of the following:

(a) Allows retail end-use customers to utilize combined heat and power systems that reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by achieving improved efficiencies utilizing heat that would otherwise be wasted in separate energy applications.

(b) Provides a market for the purchase of excess electricity generated
 by a combined heat and power system, at a just and reasonable rate, to be determined by the governing body of the utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2842.

The commission, in approving a procurement plan for an electrical corporation pursuant to Section 454.5, shall require that the electrical corporation’s procurement plan incorporate combined heat and power solutions to the extent that it is cost effective compared to other competing forms of wholesale generation, technologically feasible, and environmentally beneficial, particularly as it pertains to reducing emissions of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2842.2.

The commission shall ensure that an electrical corporation utilizes long-term planning and a reliability assessment for upgrades to its transmission and distribution systems and that any upgrades are not inconsistent with promoting combined heat and power systems that are cost effective, technologically feasible, and environmentally beneficial, particularly as those combined heat and power systems reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2842.4.

(a) The commission shall, for each electrical corporation, establish a pay-as-you-save pilot program for eligible customers.

(b) For the purposes of this section, an “eligible customer” means a customer of an electrical corporation that meets the following criteria:

(1) The customer uses a combined heat and power system with a generating capacity of not more than 20 megawatts that is in compliance with Section
 2843.

(2) The customer is any of the following:

(A) A nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) (3)), that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of that code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(a)).

(B) A federal, state, or local government facility.

(c) The pilot program shall enable an eligible customer to finance all of the upfront costs for the purchase and installation of a combined heat and power system by repaying those costs over time through on-bill financing at the difference between what an eligible customer would have paid for electricity and the actual savings derived for a period of up to 10 years.

(d) The commission
 shall ensure that the reasonable costs of the electrical corporation associated with the pilot program are recovered.

(e) All costs of the pay-as-you-save program or financing mechanisms shall be borne solely by the combined heat and power generators that use the program or financing mechanisms, and the commission shall ensure that the costs of the program are not shifted to the other customers or classes of customers of the electrical corporation.

(f) Each electric corporation shall make on-bill financing available to eligible customers until the statewide cumulative rated generating capacity from pilot program combined heat and power systems in the service territories of the three largest electrical corporations in the state reaches 100 megawatts. An electrical corporation shall only be required to participate in the pilot program until it meets its proportionate share of the
 100-megawatt limitation, based on the percentage of its peak demand to the total statewide peak demand within the service territories of all electrical corporations.

(g) An approval made by the Department of Finance for a state agency to purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire a combined heat and power facility that would be financed through the pay-as-you-save pilot program, may not be made sooner than 30 days after written notification thereof is provided to the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Chairperson of the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2843.

(a) The Energy Commission shall, by January 1, 2010, adopt guidelines that combined heat and power systems subject to this chapter shall meet, and shall accomplish all of the following:

(1) Reduce waste energy.

(2) Be sized to meet the eligible customer-generator’s thermal load.

(3) Operate continuously in a manner that meets the expected thermal load
 and optimizes the efficient use of waste heat.

(4) Are cost effective, technologically feasible, and environmentally beneficial.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the guidelines do not permit customers to operate as de facto wholesale generators with guaranteed purchasers for their electricity.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the guidelines required by this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The guidelines shall be adopted at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. At least 30 days’ public notice shall be given of the meeting required by this section, before the Energy Commission initially adopts guidelines. Substantive changes
 to the guidelines shall not be adopted without at least 10 days’ written notice to the public.

(d) Prior to January 1, 2010, the Energy Commission may adopt temporary guidelines for combined heat and power systems that comply with the parameters set forth in subdivision (a).

(e) (1) An eligible customer-generator’s combined heat and power system shall meet an oxides of nitrogen (NOx) emissions rate standard of 0.07 pounds per megawatthour and a minimum efficiency of 60 percent. A minimum efficiency of 60 percent shall be measured as useful energy output divided by fuel input. The efficiency determination shall be based on 100-percent load.

(2) An eligible customer-generator’s combined heat and power system that meets the 60-percent efficiency standard may take a credit to meet the
 applicable NOx emissions standard of 0.07 pounds per megawatthour. Credit shall be at the rate of one megawatthour for each 3.4 million British thermal units of heat recovered.

(f) An eligible customer-generator’s combined heat and power system shall comply with the greenhouse gases emission performance standard established by the commission pursuant to Section 8341.

(g) An eligible customer-generator shall adequately maintain and service the combined heat and power system so that during operation, the system continues to meet or exceed the efficiency and emissions standards established pursuant to subdivisions (a), (d), and (f).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Solar Energy Systems [2851. - 2869.]



  ARTICLE 1. Solar Energy Systems [2851. - 2854.6.]

2851.

(a) In implementing the California Solar Initiative, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) The commission shall authorize the award of monetary incentives for up to the first megawatt of alternating current generated by solar energy systems that meet the eligibility criteria established by the Energy Commission pursuant to Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 25780) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code. The commission shall determine the eligibility of a solar energy system, as defined in Section 25781 of the Public Resources Code, to receive monetary incentives until the time the Energy Commission establishes eligibility criteria pursuant to Section 25782. Monetary incentives
 shall not be awarded for solar energy systems that do not meet the eligibility criteria. The incentive level authorized by the commission shall decline each year following implementation of the California Solar Initiative, at a rate of no less than an average of 7 percent per year, and, except as provided in subparagraph (B), shall be zero as of December 31, 2016. The commission shall adopt and publish a schedule of declining incentive levels no less than 30 days in advance of the first decline in incentive levels. The commission may develop incentives based upon the output of electricity from the system, provided those incentives are consistent with the declining incentive levels of this paragraph and the incentives apply to only the first megawatt of electricity generated by the system.

(B) The incentive level for the installation of a solar energy system pursuant to Section 2852 shall be zero as of December 31, 2021.

(2) The commission shall adopt a performance-based incentive program so that by January 1, 2008, 100 percent of incentives for solar energy systems of 100 kilowatts or greater and at least 50 percent of incentives for solar energy systems of 30 kilowatts or greater are earned based on the actual electrical output of the solar energy systems. The commission shall encourage, and may require, performance-based incentives for solar energy systems of less than 30 kilowatts. Performance-based incentives shall decline at a rate of no less than an average of 7 percent per year. In developing the performance-based incentives, the commission may:

(A) Apply performance-based incentives only to customer classes designated by the commission.

(B) Design the performance-based incentives so that customers may receive a higher level of
 incentives than under incentives based on installed electrical capacity.

(C) Develop financing options that help offset the installation costs of the solar energy system, provided that this financing is ultimately repaid in full by the consumer or through the application of the performance-based rebates.

(3) By January 1, 2008, the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall require reasonable and cost-effective energy efficiency improvements in existing buildings as a condition of providing incentives for eligible solar energy systems, with appropriate exemptions or limitations to accommodate the limited financial resources of low-income residential housing.

(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 2827, the commission may develop a time-variant tariff that creates the maximum incentive for
 ratepayers to install solar energy systems so that the system’s peak electricity production coincides with California’s peak electricity demands and that ensures that ratepayers receive due value for their contribution to the purchase of solar energy systems and customers with solar energy systems continue to have an incentive to use electricity efficiently. In developing the time-variant tariff, the commission may exclude customers participating in the tariff from the rate cap for residential customers for existing baseline quantities or usage by those customers of up to 130 percent of existing baseline quantities, as required by Section 739.9. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes the commission to require time-variant pricing for ratepayers without a solar energy system.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in implementing the California Solar Initiative, the commission may authorize the award of monetary incentives for solar thermal and
 solar water heating devices, in a total amount up to one hundred million eight hundred thousand dollars ($100,800,000).

(c) (1) In implementing the California Solar Initiative, the commission shall not allocate more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) to research, development, and demonstration that explores solar technologies and other distributed generation technologies that employ or could employ solar energy for generation or storage of electricity or to offset natural gas usage. Any program that allocates additional moneys to research, development, and demonstration shall be developed in collaboration with the Energy Commission to ensure there is no duplication of efforts, and adopted by the commission through a rulemaking or other appropriate public proceeding. Any grant awarded by the commission for research, development, and demonstration shall be approved by the full commission at a public meeting. This
 subdivision does not prohibit the commission from continuing to allocate moneys to research, development, and demonstration pursuant to the self-generation incentive program for distributed generation resources originally established pursuant to Chapter 329 of the Statutes of 2000, as modified pursuant to Section 379.6.
